Montana, session 2025, LC3493.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 44-4-101, MCA, is amended to read:
"44-4-101. Position established -- salary. There is created within the department of justice the
position of training coordinator for county attorneys as appointed by the attorney general. The position of
training coordinator for county attorneys is an exempt position as provided in 2-18-103. The salary for this
position is the same as that provided in 7-4-2503 for a county attorney in a county with a population in excess
of 30,000."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****